nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Kosmetikk > Kosmetikkverktøy > Verktøy for hudpleie: Dermaplaning verktøy; Ansiktsdamper tilbehør; Ansiktsspa; Fotfiler; LED lysterapienheter; Påføring av fuktighets- og solkrem; Mikrostrøm og EMS ansiktsenheter; Pimpsteiner; Gjenbrukbare ansiktskluter og puter; Ekstraktorer for hudpleie; Hudpleieruller; Børstehoder for hudrens; Børster og systemer for hudrens
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Cosmetice > Instrumente cosmetice > Instrumente pentru îngrijirea pielii: Instrumente pentru dermaplaning; Accesorii pentru saună facială; Saune faciale; Pile pentru picioare; Dispozitive cu terapie LED; Aplicatoare de loțiune și protecție solară; Dispozitive faciale cu microcurent și EMS; Pietre ponce; Lavete și tampoane faciale reutilizabile; Extractoare pentru îngrijirea pielii; Role pentru îngrijirea pielii; Capete de perie pentru curățarea pielii; Perii și sisteme pentru curățarea pielii
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Kozmetika > Kozmetični pripomočki > Pripomočki za nego kože: Pripomočki za dermaplaning; Dodatki za savne za obraz; Obrazne savne; Pile za odstranjevanje trde kože na stopalih; Naprave za LED svetlobno terapijo; Pripomočki za nanašanje losjona in kreme za sončenje; Mikrotokovne in EMS naprave za obraz; Plovci za odstranjevanje trde kože; Večkrat uporabne krpice in blazinice za obraz; Naprave za čiščenje obraza; Valjčki za nego kože; Glave ščetk za čiščenje kože; Ščetke in sistemi za čiščenje kože
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Kozmetika > Kozmetické nástroje > Nástroje starostlivosti o pleť: Nástroje na dermaplaning; Príslušenstvo pre tvárové sauny; Tvárové sauny; Pilníky na nohy; Zariadenia na LED svetelnú terapiu; Aplikátory pleťovej vody a opaľovacích krémov; Mikroprúdové a EMS tvárové prístroje; Pemza; Opakovane použiteľné tvárové handričky a tampóny; Sady na hĺbkové čistenie pleti; Masážne valčeky na tvár; Hlavice kefky na čistenie pleti; Kefky a systémy na čistenie pleti
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cosmetici > Utensili cosmetici > Accessori cura della pelle: Strumenti di dermaplaning; Accessori della sauna facciale; Saune viso; Lime per i piedi; Dispositivi di fototerapia a LED; Applicatori di lozioni e creme solari; Dispositivi facciali a microcorrente ed EMS; Pietre pomice; Panni e cuscinetti facciali riutilizzabili; Estrattori per la cura della pelle; Rulli per la cura della pelle; Teste per spazzole per la pulizia della pelle; Spazzole e sistemi di pulizia della pelle
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Cosmetics > Cosmetic Tools > Skin Care Tools: Dermaplaning Tools; Facial Sauna Accessories; Facial Saunas; Foot Files; LED Light Therapy Devices; Lotion & Sunscreen Applicators; Microcurrent & EMS Facial Devices; Pumice Stones; Reusable Facial Cloths & Pads; Skin Care Extractors; Skin Care Rollers; Skin Cleansing Brush Heads; Skin Cleansing Brushes & Systems
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Kosmetiikka > Kosmetiikkatarvikkeet > Ihonhoitovälineet: Dermaplaning-väline; Kasvosaunan lisävaruste; Kasvosaunat; Jalkaraspit; LED-valohoitolaite; Kosteusvoiteen ja aurinkovoiteen levittimet; Mikrovirta- ja EMS-kasvohoitolaite; Hohkakivet; Uudelleenkäytettävä kasvolappu ja -tyyny; Imurit ihonhoitoon; Ihonhoitorullat; Kasvojenhoitorullat; Ihon puhdistusharjat ja -ratkaisut
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Kosmetika > Kosmetikos įrankiai > Odos priežiūros įrankiai: Dermaplaning įrankiai; Veido saunos priedai; Veido saunos; Pėdų dildės; LED šviesos terapijos prietaisai; Losjono ir priemonių nuo saulės aplikatorius; Mikrosrovės ir EMS veido prietaisai; Pemzos akmenys; Daugkartinės veido šluostės ir pagalvėlės; Inkštirų šalinimo priemonės; Odos priežiūros voleliai; Odos valymo šepečių galvutės; Odos valymo šepečiai ir sistemos
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Kosmetyki > Akcesoria kosmetyczne > Akcesoria do pielęgnacji twarzy: Narzędzia do dermaplaningu; Akcesoria do saun twarzy; Sauny do twarzy; Pilniki do stóp; Urządzenia do terapii światłem LED; Aplikatory balsamu i kremu do opalania; Urządzenia mikroprądowe i EMS do twarzy; Pumeksy; Wielorazowe ściereczki i waciki do twarzy; Przyrządy do usuwania zaskórników; Masażery do twarzy; Głowice do szczotek do oczyszczania twarzy; Szczotki i zestawy do oczyszczania twarzy
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Cosmétiques > Accessoires cosmétiques > Accessoires pour le soin de la peau: Outils de dermaplaning; Accessoires pour sauna facial; Saunas faciaux; Râpes à pieds; Appareils de luminothérapie LED; Applicateurs de lotion et de crème solaire; Appareils faciaux à microcourant et EMS; Pierres ponces; Lingettes et disques faciaux réutilisables; Extracteurs pour le soin de la peau; Rouleaux pour le soin de la peau; Têtes de brosses pour la peau; Systèmes et brosses pour nettoyer la peau
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Косметика > Косметические инструменты > Инструменты для ухода за кожей: Инструменты для дермапланинга; Аксессуары для лицевых саун; Паровые сауны для лица; Пилки для стоп; Устройства для светодиодной терапии; Аппликаторы для лосьонов и солнцезащитных средств; Микротоковые и EMS-устройства для лица; Пемза; Многоразовые салфетки и подушечки для лица; Инструменты для удаления прыщей и черных точек; Ролики для ухода за кожей; Насадки для щеток для очистки кожи; Щетки и системы для очистки кожи
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cosméticos > Ferramentas cosméticas > Ferramentas para cuidados com a pele: Ferramentas de dermaplaning; Acessórios para sauna facial; Saunas faciais; Lixa para pés; Dispositivos de terapia com luz LED; Aplicadores de loção e filtro solar; Dispositivos faciais de microcorrente e EMS; Pedras-pomes; Panos e almofadas faciais reutilizáveis; Removedores de impurezas; Rolos dermatológicos; Cabeças de escovas para limpeza de pele; Sistemas e pincéis de limpeza de pele
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Cosmetica > Cosmetische hulpmiddelen > Hulpmiddelen voor huidverzorging: Dermaplaning gereedschap; Gezichts sauna accessoires; Gezichtsauna's; Eeltvijlen; LED lichttherapie apparaten; Applicators voor lotion en zonnebrandcrème; Microcurrent en EMS gezichtsapparaten; Puimstenen; Herbruikbare gezichtsdoekjes en pads; Gezichtverzorgingsproducten; Huidrollers; Losse huidreinigingsborsteltjes; Huidreinigingsborstels en -systemen
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Καλλυντικά > Καλλυντικά εργαλεία > Εργαλεία περιποίησης δέρματος: Εργαλεία ξυρίσματος προσώπου (dermaplaning); Αξεσουάρ ατμού προσώπου; Σάουνες προσώπου; Λίμες ποδιών; Συσκευές φωτοθεραπείας LED; Απλικατέρ για λοσιόν & αντιηλιακά; Συσκευές microcurrent προσώπου; Ελαφρόπετρες; Επαναχρησιμοποιούμενα πανάκια; Εργαλεία εξαγωγής για περιποίηση δέρματος; Ρολά περιποίησης δέρματος; Κεφαλές βούρτσας καθαρισμού δέρματος; Βούρτσες & συστήματα καθαρισμού δέρματος
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Kosmetik > Kosmetiske redskaber > Redskaber til hudpleje: Dermaplaning-værktøjer; Ansigtssauna-tilbehør; Ansigtssaunaer; Fodfiler; LED-lysterapienheder; Påførselsanordninger til lotion og solcreme; Mikrostrøms- og EMS-ansigtenheder; Pimpsten; Genanvendelige ansigtsklude og puder; Tænger til hudpleje; Ruller til hudpleje; Penselhoveder til ansigtsrens; Børster og systemer til rensning af huden
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 化妆品 > 美容工具 > 皮肤护理工具: 去角质刀; 面部蒸汽机配件; 面部桑拿; 脚锉; LED 光疗仪; 乳液/防晒霜敷抹器; 微电流与 EMS 美容仪; 磨脚石; 可重复使用面巾/棉片; 粉刺针; 美容微针滚轮; 皮肤清洁刷头; 皮肤清洁刷/洗脸仪
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cosmética > Equipamento de cosmética > Ferramentas de cuidado da pele: Ferramentas de dermaplaning; Acessórios para saunas faciais; Saunas faciais; Limas para pés; Dispositivos de fototerapia LED; Loções e aplicadores de creme solar; Dispositivos faciais de microcorrente e EMS; Pedra-pomes; Panos e discos faciais reutilizáveis; Extratores de cuidados da pele; Rolos de cuidados da pele; Cabeças de escovas de limpeza da pele; Sistemas e escovas de limpeza da pele
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Kozmetikumok > Kozmetikai eszközök > Bőrápoló eszközök: Dermaplaning eszközök; Arcszauna-kiegészítők; Arcszaunák; Lábreszelők; LED-fényterápiás készülékek; Testápoló- és napvédőkrém-alkalmazók; Mikroáramú és EMS-arckészülékek; Habkövek; Újrahasználható arckendők és -párnák; Bőrápoló kivonók; Bőrápoló hengerek; Bőrtisztító kefefejek; Bőrtisztító kefék és rendszerek
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > コスメ・スキンケア > メイク道具・ネイルケア用品 > スキンケア用品: ダーマプレーニングツール; フェイシャルサウナアクセサリー; スチーム美顔器; かかと用やすり; LED光療法機器; ローション/日焼け止めアプリケーター; マイクロカレント・EMS美顔器; 軽石; 再利用可能な洗顔クロス・パッド; 角栓除去・毛穴ケア; 美顔ローラー; 洗顔ブラシ用替えブラシ; 洗顔ブラシ
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Kozmetik > Kozmetik Aletleri > Cilt Bakım Aletleri: Dermaplaning Araçları; Yüz Saunası Aksesuarları; Yüz Saunaları; Ayak Törpüleri; LED Işık Terapi Cihazları; Losyon ve Güneş Kremi Uygulayıcıları; Mikro Akım ve EMS Yüz Cihazları; Ponza Taşları; Yeniden Kullanılabilir Yüz Bezleri ve Pedleri; Siyah Nokta Çıkarma Aletleri; Cilt Bakım Ruloları; Cilt Temizleme Fırçası Başlıkları; Cilt Temizleme Fırça ve Sistemleri
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Kosmetika > Kosmetikverktyg > Verktyg för hudvård: Verktyg för dermaplaning; Tillbehör till ansiktsbastu; Ansiktssaunor; Fotfilar; LED-ljusterapienheter; Hudkräm och solskyddskräm; Mikroström- och EMS-ansiktsenheter; Pimpsten; Återanvändbara ansiktsdukar och kuddar; Pormaskborttagare; Hudvårdsrullar; Borsthuvuden till hudrengöring; Borstar och system för hudrengöring
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Kosmetika > Kosmetické pomůcky > Pomůcky pro péči o kůži: Nástroje na dermaplaning; Příslušenství k obličejové sauně; Obličejové sauny; Pilníky na paty; Přístroje na světelnou LED terapii; Pomůcky pro nanášení pleťové vody a krémů; Mikroprodové a EMS obličejové přístroje; Pemzy; Znovupoužitelné obličejové ubrousky a polštářky; Nástroje na odstranění uhrů; Rolery na péči o pokožku; Hlavice na kartáčky na čištění pleti; Čističe pleti
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Kosmetika > Kosmetik-Zubehör > Hautpflegeutensilien: Dermaplaning-Werkzeuge; Gesichtssauna-Zubehör; Gesichtssaunas; Fußfeilen; LED-Lichttherapiegeräte; Applikatoren für Lotionen und Sonnenschutzcremes; Mikrostrom- & EMS-Gesichtsgeräte; Bimssteine; Wiederverwendbare Gesichtstücher & Pads; Mitesser-Entferner; Hautpflegeroller; Hautreinigungs-Bürstenköpfe; Gesichtsbürsten
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Козметика > Козметични инструменти > Инструменти за грижа за кожата: Инструменти за дермапланинг; Аксесоари за сауна за лице; Сауни за лице; Пили за крака; LED устройства за светлинна терапия; Апликатори за лосиони и слънцезащитни продукти; Микротокови и EMS лицеви устройства; Пемзи; Многократни кърпи и тампони за лице; Инструменти за премахване на несъвършенства по кожата; Ролери за грижа за кожата; Глави за четки за почистване на кожата; Четки и системи за почистване на кожата
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 화장품 > 화장 도구 > 스킨 케어 도구: 더마플래닝 도구; 페이셜 사우나 액세서리; 얼굴용 스팀기; 풋 파일; LED 광선 치료 기기; 로션/선크림 도포용 도구; 마이크로커런트 및 EMS 페이셜 기기; 각질제거 돌; 재사용 가능 페이셜 천 및 패드; 피지 압출기; 스킨 케어 롤러; 클렌징 브러시 헤드; 세안 브러시/도구
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > เครื่องสำอาง > เครื่องมือของเครื่องสำอาง > อุปกรณ์ดูแลผิว: อุปกรณ์ขูดผิวหน้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องซาวน่าใบหน้า; การอบไอน้ำสำหรับหน้า; ที่ตะไบเท้า; เครื่องบำบัดด้วยแสง LED; อุปกรณ์สำหรับทาโลชั่นและครีมกันแดด; เครื่องกระตุ้นกล้ามเนื้อและ EMS สำหรับใบหน้า; หินขัดเท้า; ผ้าและแผ่นเช็ดหน้าแบบใช้ซ้ำ; เครื่องมือดึงสิวหัวดำ; ลูกกลิ้งดูแลผิว; หัวแปรงทำความสะอาดผิว; แปรงและระบบทำความสะอาดผิว
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 化妝品 > 美妝工具 > 肌膚保養用品: 刮毛工具; 臉部蒸氣機配件; 臉部蒸氣; 去腳皮銼和去腳繭銼; LED 光療裝置; 乳液/防曬乳塗抹用具; 微電流及 EMS 臉部裝置; 去角質磨石; 可重複使用洗臉巾及墊; 護膚粉刺棒; 護膚微針滾輪; 潔顏刷頭; 皮膚清潔用刷
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Kozmetika > Kozmetički alati > Alati za njegu kože: Alati za dermaplaning; Dodatna oprema za saunu za lice; Saune za lice; Turpije za stopala; LED uređaji za svjetlosnu terapiju; Aplikatori za losione i kreme za sunčanje; Mikrostrujni i EMS uređaji za lice; Plovućac; Krpice i jastučići za lice za višekratnu upotrebu; Ekstraktori za njegu kože; Valjci za njegu kože; Glave četkica za čišćenje kože; Četkice i sustavi za čišćenje kože
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Mỹ phẩm > Dụng cụ trang điểm mỹ phẩm > Dụng cụ chăm sóc da: Dụng cụ cạo da; Phụ kiện xông hơi mặt; Máy xông hơi mặt; Dụng cụ tẩy da chết bàn chân; Thiết bị trị liệu ánh sáng LED; Dụng cụ thoa kem dưỡng và kem chống nắng; Thiết bị vi điện và EMS chăm sóc da mặt; Đá bọt; Khăn và miếng lau mặt tái sử dụng; Dụng cụ nặn mụn chăm sóc da; Lăn kim chăm sóc da; Đầu bàn chải làm sạch da; Cọ và dụng cụ làm sạch da
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cosméticos > Objetos cosméticos > Objetos para el cuidado de la piel: Herramientas de dermaplaning; Accesorios de sauna facial; Saunas faciales; Limas para pies; Dispositivos de terapia de luz LED; Artículos para aplicar lociones y protectores solares; Dispositivos faciales de microcorriente y EMS; Piedras pómez; Paños y almohadillas faciales reutilizables; Extractores para cuidado de la piel; Rodillos para el cuidado de la piel; Cabezales de cepillos de limpieza facial; Cepillos y sistemas de limpieza de la piel